Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 21 JUNIOR COLLEGES
33-2110A. Tuition of out-of-district Idaho students, county taxes and other financial support.

Any student residing in the area of a county outside of a community college district or in a county without a community college district, who has been a resident of the county and state as defined by section 33-2110B, Idaho Code, immediately prior to the date of his first enrollment in a community college, which residence may not be acquired while attending and enrolled in a community college, may enroll in any community college in the state, and the county of his residence shall pay that portion of his tuition as hereinafter set out. The tuition which shall be paid by the resident county shall be that portion of the tuition uniformly established by a community college district for all out-of-district students, both in state as well as out of state, pursuant to section 33-2110, Idaho Code, after deducting therefrom the amount of tuition paid by a resident student at the community college; however, the liability of the resident county shall not exceed two-thirds (2/3) of the total tuition and fees charged and in no instance shall it exceed five hundred dollars ($500) each semester for a two (2) semester year for a full-time student. The student shall pay the tuition and fees charged a student resident in the district, and the balance, if any, of the out-of-district student tuition above the maximum liability of the county of his residence. No county shall be liable for out-of-district tuition unless the board of county commissioners of that county has first verified to the community college in writing the fact that the student is a resident of the county. Upon verification, the county shall thereafter be liable for the out-of-district tuition so long as the student is duly enrolled and attending the college subject to the following limitations:

Liability shall be the term of the curriculum for which the student is enrolled, with a maximum lifetime liability of three thousand dollars ($3,000). The three thousand dollar ($3,000) maximum is exclusive of any reimbursement to counties for county tuition from the state or other funds.

Liability shall terminate if the student’s domiciliary residence changes and that change continues for twelve (12) months.

The tuition shall be established annually not later than August 1 and shall be forthwith filed with the state board of education, together with a statement supporting the computation thereof.

To receive county payment of tuition, each out-of-district student taking community college courses shall complete a certificate of residency form and submit it to the county clerk of their resident county on or before December 1 of each year for classes taken during that fall semester, and on or before May 1 of each year for classes taken during that spring semester. Failure by a student to submit the certificate of residency form by these deadlines is sufficient grounds for denial of the certificate of residency by the county.

Each county shall provide information regarding which students’ certificates of residency were approved to each community college on or before December 20 of each year for classes taken during that fall semester, and on or before May 20 of each year for classes taken during that spring semester.

Each community college shall submit an invoice to each county of residence of each out-of-district student on or before January 20 of each year for classes taken during that fall semester, and on or before June 20 of each year for classes taken during that spring semester. Counties are not required to pay for classes that are billed past these deadlines. Invoices shall list the out-of-district tuition amount for each out-of-district student who was approved by the county of residency, and shall list only students still duly enrolled in the class past the community college’s drop deadline.

Each board of county commissioners shall allow and order paid any timely submitted and proper invoice for tuition at a regular meeting following receipt of the invoice. Upon failure of a county to pay a timely submitted and proper invoice, a community college district may commence action in the district court of the state of Idaho for the county to collect the same.

For the payment of tuition of out-of-district students as herein provided, there shall be allocated in each county without a community college district to a county community college fund, and paid to the county treasurer to be held in that fund, fifty percent (50%) of all moneys apportioned to the county out of liquor funds of the state of Idaho as set forth in chapter 4, title 23, Idaho Code, and that amount shall be deducted from the amount that would otherwise be allocated to the county; and if liquor funds are not sufficient to pay the tuition, commencing for the calendar year 1966, the board of county commissioners shall levy upon the taxable property within each county without a community college district, and, in a county with such a district, upon the taxable property within the county lying outside of the community college district, a property tax not to exceed six hundredths percent (.06%) of market value for assessment purposes, to be certified as set out in section 33-2111, Idaho Code. The proceeds of the levy shall be placed in the county community college fund.

33-2110B. Residency — Rules — Appeal — Standards for in-district, out-of-district and out-of-state students.

For purposes of this chapter, an “in-district student” is:

Any student whose parents or court-appointed guardians are domiciled in the community college district and provide more than fifty percent (50%) of his support. Domicile, as used in this section, means an individual’s true, fixed and permanent home and place of habitation. It is the place where he intends to remain and to which he expects to return when he leaves without intending to establish a new domicile elsewhere. To qualify under this section, the parents or guardian must have resided continuously in the community college district for twelve (12) months next preceding the opening day of the term for which the student matriculates.

Any student who receives less than fifty percent (50%) of his support from parents or legal guardians who are not residents of the community college district for voting purposes and who has continuously resided in the community college district for twelve (12) months next preceding the opening day of the period of instruction during which he proposes to attend the community college.

The spouse of a person who is classified, or is eligible for classification, as a resident of the community college district for the purposes of attending that community college.

A member of the armed forces of the United States, stationed in the community college district on military orders or who entered service as a resident of the community college district and who has maintained resident status, but is not stationed within the community college district on military orders.

An officer or an enlisted member of the Idaho national guard.

A student whose parents or guardians are members of the armed forces and stationed in the community college district on military orders and who receives fifty percent (50%) or more of support from parents or legal guardians. The student, while in continuous attendance, shall not lose his residence when his parents or guardians are transferred on military orders.

A person separated, under honorable conditions, from the United States armed forces after at least two (2) years of active service, who at the time of separation designates the community college district as his intended domicile or who has the district as the home of record in service and enters the community college within one (1) year of the date of separation.

Any individual who has been domiciled in the community college district, has qualified and would otherwise be qualified under the provisions of this statute and who is away from the district for a period of less than one (1) calendar year and has not established legal residence elsewhere, provided a twelve (12) month period of continuous residence has been established immediately prior to departure.

A community college board of trustees shall adopt rules and regulations applicable to their college now or hereafter established to determine in-district, out-of-district and out-of-state residence status of any student and to establish procedures for review of that status.

Appeal from a final determination denying resident status may be initiated by the filing of an action in the district court of the county in which the affected community college is located. An appeal from the district court shall lie as in all civil actions.

Nothing contained herein shall prevent a community college board of trustees from waiving tuition to be paid by out-of-district, out-of-state or foreign students.
(5) Nothing contained herein shall prevent a community college board of trustees from establishing quotas, standards for admission, standards for readmission, or other terms and requirements governing persons who are not residents for purposes of the first two (2) years of postsecondary education.

33-2111. Taxes and other financial support for community colleges.

For the maintenance and operation of each community college, in addition to the income from tuition paid by students as hereinbefore provided, the board of trustees may levy upon the taxable property within the district a tax not to exceed one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (.125%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property within the district.

The tax levy determined by the board of trustees, within said limit, shall be certified to the board of county commissioners in each county in which the district may lie, not later than the second Monday in September of each year. No levy in excess of one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (.125%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property within the district shall be made unless a supplemental levy in a specified amount be first authorized through an election held, as provided in title 34, Idaho Code, as if the community college district were a school district and approved by a majority of the district electors voting in such election.

33-2112. Additional tax levy for gymnasium and grounds.

The board of trustees of any community college district may levy a tax not exceeding one one-hundredth percent (.01%) on each dollar of the assessed value of the taxable property within the district for the maintenance and care of the gymnasium and college grounds of the district, in addition to other taxes authorized by law for the maintenance and support of the community college.

33-2113. Capital funds.

The board of trustees of each junior college district may issue general obligation bonds in the manner and form, and for the same purposes, as prescribed for public school districts, the maximum amount of general obligation bonds outstanding, computed in the manner so prescribed shall not at any time exceed one per cent (1%) of the market value for assessment purposes of the taxable property in the district. The board may also create a plant facilities reserve fund in the manner, and for the same purposes, as prescribed for school districts.

Tax levies for the purposes of this section shall be certified to the board of county commissioners at the same time as are certified the tax levies provided in section 33-2111, Idaho Code.

The board of trustees of each junior or community college district may issue bonds in the same manner and form, and for the same purposes as state institutions of higher education pursuant to chapter 38, title 33, Idaho Code.

33-2114. Reports of junior college districts.

The board of trustees of each junior college district shall cause to be made, annually, a full and complete audit of the financial transactions of the district. Such audit shall be made by and under the direction of the board of trustees by an independent auditor in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and procedures. The auditor shall be employed on written contract.

One (1) copy of the audit report shall be filed with the legislative services office, and one (1) copy with the state board of education, not more than ten (10) days after its acceptance by the board of trustees.

The state board of education may at its discretion direct the board of trustees of any junior college district to cause to be made an examination of the books and accounts of their district, as provided for public school districts.

The board of trustees shall submit to the state board of education such other reports as the state board may from time to time require.

33-2115. Counties, cities, school districts and boards to cooperate.

The county commissioners of the county in which any community college is located, the mayor and council of the city in or adjacent to which a community college is located, and the board of trustees of the school district in such city, whether operating under special charter or general law, shall be and hereby are authorized and empowered to cooperate with the board of trustees of the community college district, and to permit the use, for community college purposes, of such buildings, grounds, athletic fields, gymnasiums, libraries, laboratories and other equipment and facilities, as are not at the time required for other purposes by such county, city or school district.

The boards of trustees of community college districts shall be and hereby are authorized and empowered to cooperate with the county commissioners, mayors, city councils and school district boards of trustees identified in subsection (1) of this section and to permit the use, for such county, city and school district purposes, of such buildings, grounds, athletic fields, gymnasiums, libraries, laboratories and other equipment and facilities, as are not at the time required for other purposes by the community college.

33-2116. Dormitory housing projects — Student union buildings — Finding and declaration of necessity.

It is hereby declared: That in certain communities within the state wherein junior college districts have been created there are and will be insufficient housing and other facilities for students desiring to attend such junior colleges, and that it is in the community interest to provide adequate low-cost dormitories and student union buildings for students desiring to attend such institutions; that private sources cannot provide the types of such housing and facilities required for such students within the cost which said students may pay; that it is determined to be desirable that such dormitories and student union buildings be constructed from moneys obtained from other than ad valorem taxes and without any liability, debt or encumbrance upon junior college districts; and the necessity and the public interest in the provisions hereinafter enacted are hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

33-2117. Definitions.

The following terms, wherever used or referred to in this act, shall have the following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Junior college housing commission” or “commission” shall mean any public corporation created by section 33-2118.

“District” shall mean any junior college district organized and existing under chapter 21 of title 33, Idaho Code.

“Governing body” shall mean the board of trustees of a junior college district.

“Chairman” shall mean the chairman of the board of trustees of a junior college district.

“Clerk” shall mean the clerk of the board of trustees of a junior college district.

“Federal government” shall include the United States of America and any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Dormitory project” shall mean the construction of dormitory or dormitories for occupation by students attending a junior college organized under chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code, and shall include the construction of buildings for occupation by students and facilities for the feeding and recreation of students, equipment and furniture therefor and all matters usually incidental thereto, including the furnishing of sewer, heat, water service, landscaping, and streets or rights of ingress and egress. The term “dormitory project” also may be applied to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the construction, reconstruction, alteration and repair of the improvements, and all other work in connection therewith.

“Students” shall mean persons duly enrolled as students in a junior college.

“Bonds” shall mean any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued by a commission pursuant to this act.

“Real property” shall include all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgments, mortgage or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such liens.

“Obligee of the commission” or “Obligee” shall include any bondholder, trustee or trustees for any bondholders, or lessors demising to the commission property used in connection with the dormitory project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor’s interest, or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the commission.

“Drop deadline” shall mean the last date by which a student can drop a class and still receive a one hundred percent (100%) refund of tuition and fees from the college. “Drop deadline” does not mean the withdrawal deadline.

“Withdrawal deadline” shall mean the last date by which a student can drop a class and receive a “W” grade.

“Out-of-district student” shall mean a student who is a resident of the state of Idaho but is not an in-district student as defined in section 33-2110B, Idaho Code.

33-2118. Creation of dormitory housing commissions.

In each junior college district of the state there is hereby created an independent public body corporate and politic to be known as a dormitory housing commission which shall not be an agency of the junior college district; provided, however, that such commission shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder until or unless the board of trustees of the junior college district, by proper resolution, shall declare at any time hereafter that there is need for a commission to function in such district. The determination as to whether or not there is such need for a commission to function (a) may be made by the governing body on its own motion or (b) shall be made by the governing body upon the filing of a petition signed by twenty-five (25) residents of the district asserting that there is need for a commission to function in such district and requesting that the governing body so declare.

The governing body shall adopt a resolution declaring that there is need for a dormitory or dormitories at the junior college operated by such district, and shall set out in said resolution its finding, setting forth the necessity for such dormitory or dormitories, including such facts as it may find proper supporting such resolution.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to any contract of, the commission, the commission shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers hereunder, upon proof of the adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees of a junior college district declaring the need for the commission. Such resolution or resolutions shall be deemed sufficient if it declares that there is such need for a commission and finds in substantially the foregoing terms (no further detail being necessary) that such conditions exist in the junior college district. A copy of such resolution, duly certified by the clerk, shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action or proceeding.

33-2119. Appointment, qualifications and tenure of commissioners.

When the board of trustees of a junior college district adopts a resolution as set forth in the preceding section, the clerk of said board shall promptly transmit a certified copy of said resolution to the governor of the state of Idaho, and the governor shall promptly thereafter appoint three (3) persons as commissioners of the commission created for said district. The governor shall certify to the clerk of the district the names of the persons so appointed, and the clerk shall notify said persons in writing of their appointment and the term for which each of them is appointed. The commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1), two (2) and three (3) years respectively, from the date of their appointment, but thereafter commissioners shall be appointed as aforesaid for a term of office of 3 years, except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. No commissioner may be an officer of [or] employee of the junior college district for which the commission is created. A commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk, and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner. A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services for the authority in any capacity, but he shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties.

The powers of each commission shall be vested in the commissioners thereof in office from time to time. Two (2) commissioners shall constitute a quorum of the authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present. The by-laws of the commission shall designate which of the commissioners appointed shall be the first chairman, and such chairman shall serve in the capacity of chairman until the expiration of his term of office as commissioner. When the office of the chairman thereafter becomes vacant, the commissioners shall select a chairman from their number. The commissioners shall select from their number a vice-chairman, and may employ a secretary (who may be executive director), technical experts and such other officers, agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. The persons employed by the commission may be employees of the junior college district but shall not be trustees of the district. For such legal services as it may require, the commission may employ its own counsel. The commission may delegate to one (1) or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it may deem proper.

33-2120. Interested commissioners or employees.

No commissioner or employee shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any dormitory project or in any property included or planned to be included in any project, nor shall he have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any dormitory project. If any commissioner or employee owns or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included, in any dormitory project, he immediately shall disclose the same in writing to the authority and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Failure to so disclose such interest shall constitute misconduct in office. Upon such disclosure such commissioner or employee shall not participate in any action affecting such property or have any further connection or position with the commission.

33-2121. Removal of commissioners.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed by the governor of Idaho upon receiving a resolution therefor by junior college trustees requesting such removal and setting out the grounds and reasons for such request, but a commissioner shall be removed only after he shall have been given a copy of the resolution at least ten (10) days prior to a hearing thereon if a hearing is requested to be held before the governor and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. In the event of the removal of any commissioner pursuant to this section, a report of the proceeding, together with the charges and findings thereon, shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district.

33-2122. Powers and duties of dormitory housing commissions.

A dormitory housing commission shall constitute an independent public body corporate and politic, exercising public and essential governmental functions, and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this act, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:

To sue and be sued; to have a corporate seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the commission, and to make and from time to time amend and repeal by-laws, rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this act, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the commission.

Within the junior college district: to prepare, carry out, acquire, lease and operate dormitory housing projects; to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration or repair of any dormitory housing project or any part thereof; to contract for the management and supervision of dormitory housing projects, and in this connection the supervision of the students occupying a dormitory shall be delegated to the officers and employees of the junior college so that the supervision and conduct of such dormitory and its occupants are harmonious with the supervision and conduct of similar dormitories or other operations conducted by said junior college, it being considered that it is necessary that the junior college, at which the students occupying said dormitories are attending, shall have fit and proper control and responsibility of the discipline, supervision and conduct of such students; provided further that a lease may be entered into leasing the dormitory and properties to the junior college district under any terms and conditions deemed reasonable and desirable by the commissioner [commission] and the board of trustees of the junior college.

To arrange or contract for the furnishing by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works or facilities for, or in connection with, a dormitory housing project; and to include in any contract let in connection with a project any stipulations required by law relating to wages and hours of labor, and comply with any conditions which the federal government may attach to its financial aid of the project.

To own, hold and improve real and personal property; to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant or bequest or devise or otherwise, any real or personal property or any interest therein; to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property; to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge or dispose of any real or personal property or any interest therein; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operation of the authority against any risks or hazards; to procure or agree to the procurement of insurance or guaranties from the federal government of the payment of any bonds or parts thereof issued by an authority, including the power to pay premiums on such insurance; to rent, manage and lease said dormitory housing projects within the purview and purpose of this act, and to establish and revise the rents or charges therefor; provided, however, that said rents shall be as uniform as may be possible under the terms and conditions of the obligations of such commission with similar dormitory rentals at said junior college;

To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to purchase its bonds at a price not more than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, and all bonds so purchased shall be cancelled.
(f) To exercise all or any part or combination of powers herein granted and do all things necessary or incidental to the proper operation of this act.

No provisions of law with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to any commission unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

33-2123. Operation not for profit.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state that each dormitory housing commission shall manage and operate or contract for the operation or management of its dormitory housing project in an efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the rentals to students at said junior college at the lowest possible rates consistent with providing decent, safe and sanitary accommodations, and no dormitory housing commission shall construct or operate any such project for profit or as a source of revenue to the junior college district; provided, however, that such commission shall fix the rentals for such dormitory at no higher rates than it shall find necessary in order to produce revenues (a) to pay, as the same become due, the principal and interest on the bonds of the commission, (b) to meet the cost of and to provide for maintaining and operating the projects (including the cost of any insurance) and the administrative expenses of the commission; and (c) to create (during not less than the six (6) years immediately succeeding its issuance of any bonds) a reserve sufficient to meet the largest principal and interest payments which will be due on such bonds in any one year thereafter, and to maintain such reserve.

33-2124. Planning, zoning and building laws.

All dormitory housing projects of a commission shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary and buildings laws, ordinances and regulations applicable to the locality in which the dormitory is situated. In the planning and location of any dormitory the commission shall take into consideration the general plan of the junior college campus and shall confer and cooperate with the board of trustees so that such dormitory, both in architecture and location, shall comply with the plan of development of said junior college.

33-2125. Bonds.

A dormitory housing commission shall have power to issue bonds from time to time in its discretion, for any of its corporate purposes. A commission shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring bonds previously issued by it. In order to carry out the purposes of this act, a commission may issue, upon proper resolution, bonds on which the principal and interest are payable (a) exclusively from the income and revenue of a dormitory project financed with the proceeds of such bonds; or (b) exclusively from such income and revenues together with grants and contributions from the federal government or other source in aid of such project; provided that the proceeds of grants of funds and moneys received or to be received from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, pursuant to agreements entered into between the commission and the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof prior to the issuance of the bonds, may be considered as revenue of the project for which such bonds are issued.

Neither the commissioners nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof. The bonds and other obligations of a commission (and such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face) shall not be a debt or liability, direct or indirect, of the junior college district, the state, or any political subdivision thereof, and neither the junior college district, the state or any political subdivision thereof, shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds other than those of the commission or funds due the commission. Bonds of a commission are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and to be public instrumentalities and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from taxes.

33-2126. Form and sale of bonds.

When the commission shall find the proposed dormitory project or projects to be necessary for the proper operation of the junior college and economically feasible and such finding is recorded in the minutes of the commission, the commission shall be authorized by its resolution (and) [to issue bonds which] may be issued in one (1) or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium) as such resolution, its trust indenture, or the bonds so issued may provide.

The bonds may be sold at public sale at not less than par; provided, however, that if such bonds are sold to the United States of America or an agency or instrumentality thereof, they may be sold at private sale.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of the commission whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this act shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action or proceedings involving the validity or enforceability of any bond of a commission or the security therefor, any such bond, reciting in substance that it has been issued by the commission to aid in financing a dormitory housing project to provide dwelling accommodations for students attending a junior college, shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for a dormitory housing project of such character, and said project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located and constructed in accordance with purposes and provisions of this act.

33-2127. Provisions of bonds and trust indentures.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under leases and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, the commission, in addition to its other powers, shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees or revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence, the proceeds of grants of funds and moneys received or to be received from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof pursuant to agreements entered into between the commission and the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof prior to the issuance of the bonds may be considered as revenues of the project as referred to in this chapter.

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees and revenues, or against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenues or property; to covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any dormitory housing projects or any part thereof; and to covenant as to what other or additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it.

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds; to covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon; and to redeem the bonds, and to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant (subject to the limitations contained in this act) as to the rents and fees to be charged in the operation of a dormitory housing project or projects, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof; to create or to authorize the creation of special funds for moneys held for construction or operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes, and to covenant as to the use and disposition of the moneys held in such funds.

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given.

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its real or personal property; and to covenant as to the maintenance of its real and personal property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance moneys.

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition or obligation; and to covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

To vest in a trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds; to vest in a trustee or trustees the right, in the event of a default by said commission, to take possession of any dormitory housing project or part thereof, and (so long as said commission shall continue in default) to retain such possession and use, operate and manage said project, and to collect the rents and revenues arising therefrom and to dispose of such moneys in accordance with the agreement of the commission with said trustee; to provide for the powers and duties of a trustee or trustees and to limit the liabilities thereof; and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds.
(i) To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers herein granted; to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character; to make such covenants as will tend to make the bonds more marketable notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein but not contrary hereto.